Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 3 Barbers
62-3-134. Certificate of registration for mobile shop.

No person shall operate a mobile shop, as defined in § 62-4-102, where barbering or barber styling is practiced without a valid certificate of registration for a mobile shop issued by the board. Application for the certificate shall be made upon application forms furnished by the board.

The board shall issue a certificate of registration for a mobile shop to an applicant who:

Holds a valid, current certificate of registration for a barber shop that has a fixed location;

Pays an application fee in an amount set by the board by rule, not to exceed the cost of administering this section;

Pays an initial registration fee in the amount set by the board by rule; and

Undergoes and passes an initial inspection.

A certificate of registration for a mobile shop shall be subject to renewal at the same time that the registrant's barber shop registration is subject to renewal pursuant to § 62-3-129. The renewal fee for a certificate of registration for a mobile shop shall be set by the board by rule.

A mobile shop for which a certificate of registration is issued shall be subject to all of the health and safety requirements that apply to barber shops that have a fixed location under this chapter and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto; provided, that a mobile shop shall not be required to have a restroom and that the board may promulgate rules allowing or requiring mobile shops to have equipment different from shops with a fixed location.

The board may either refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke any certificate of registration for a mobile shop for any of the reasons in § 62-3-121.

The board shall revoke any certificate of registration for a mobile shop if the registrant's certificate of registration for a barber shop that has a fixed location expires or is revoked.

If a registrant's certificate of registration for a barber shop that has a fixed location is suspended, the board shall also suspend any certificate of registration that has been issued to such registrant for a mobile shop for the same period of time.

Acts 2016, ch. 983, § 1.

62-3-135. Residential barber certificate.

No person may provide residential services without a valid residential barber certificate issued by the board pursuant to this section. Application for a residential barber certificate must be made upon application forms furnished by the board.

The board shall issue a residential barber certificate to an applicant who:

Holds a valid, current certificate of registration as a barber;

Pays an application fee in an amount set by the board by rule, not to exceed the cost of administering this section;

Pays an initial registration fee in an amount set by the board by rule; and

Undergoes and passes an initial inspection of the equipment used to provide residential services, as determined by the board by rule.

A residential barber certificate is subject to renewal at the same time that the registrant's barber registration is subject to renewal. The renewal fee for a residential barber certificate shall be set by the board by rule.

The board may promulgate rules regarding health and safety requirements for barbers providing residential services.

The board may either refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke, any residential barber certificate pursuant to this section for any of the reasons in § 62-3-121.

The board shall revoke any residential barber certificate issued pursuant to this section if the registrant's certificate of registration as a barber expires or is revoked.

If a registrant's certificate of registration as a barber is suspended, the board must also suspend the registrant's residential barber certificate that has been issued, if any.

Any barber providing residential services shall, prior to performing such services, make the barber's residential barber certificate available to the person for review.

For purposes of this section:

“Residential barber certificate” means a certificate of registration for the provision of residential services issued by the board; and

“Residential services” means services set out in § 62-3-105 when provided in the residence of the person to whom the services are being rendered.

Acts 2017, ch. 102, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 102, § 3 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-3-103. [Reserved.]

62-3-105. Acts constituting barbering.

62-3-107. Registration required for barbering, barber instruction or serving as technician.

62-3-132. Animals permitted in barbershops.